Utah statutes.
13-20-6.   Enforcement -- Limited liability of dealer -- No limit on other rights or remedies.

(1)  The Division of Consumer Protection shall, or a consumer may, enforce the rights created under this chapter.  An action may be commenced by a consumer only after the claim has been investigated and evaluated by the division.

(2)  This chapter may not be interpreted as imposing any liability on an authorized dealer or creating a cause of action by a consumer against a dealer under this chapter, except regarding any written express warranties made by the dealer apart from the manufacturer's own warranties.

(3)  This chapter does not limit the rights or remedies which are otherwise available to a consumer under any other law.

(4)  In an action initiated under this section by the consumer, the court may award attorneys' fees to the prevailing party.



Amended by Chapter 249, 1990 General Session

